Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-525
Bonds or certificates; validation.

(1) Bonds or certificates, when validated under section 58-524, shall have stamped or written on the bond or certificate, by the proper officers of such contracting public body issuing them, a statement in substantially the following form: "This bond is one of a series of bonds which were validated by judgment of the District Court for ............ County, rendered on .......... 20....".

(2) A certified copy of the judgment or decree shall be received as evidence in any court in this state.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 25;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 27.